Massachusetts, session 194th, H4961.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 17Z the following section:-
Section 17AA. (a) The commission shall provide to any person who is insured under the
group insurance commission coverage of all medical supplies for management of surgically
created or spontaneous fistulas and coverage of supplies related to ostomy care. The commission
shall not require the use of non-medical supplies for a patient to receive coverage under this
section. The commission shall make publicly available information about its coverage of
supplies related to ostomy care.
(b) If a person obtains new health insurance coverage, information about the person’s
ostomy care, patient history and prescriptions shall be transferred to the new insurer within 72
hours for continuity of care. Ostomy supply orders and shipments shall not be delayed during the
transition period.
of 9

(c) Healthcare payers shall reimburse suppliers of supplies related to ostomy care at a rate
not less than the Medicare reimbursement rate.
SECTION 2. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 51O the following section:-
Section 51P. Any acute-care hospital licensed pursuant to this chapter that performs
ostomy surgery shall employ and have access to certified healthcare professionals who specialize
in ostomy care. The acute-care hospital shall ensure ongoing follow-up care offers ostomy care
in an outpatient setting, as appropriate, with certified healthcare professionals who specialize in
ostomy care.
SECTION 3. Chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 12D the following section:-
Section 12D½. (a) A prescription issued in the commonwealth by a physician licensed
pursuant to this chapter for supplies related to an ostomy shall be valid for at least 1 year without
disruption in fulfillment and coverage for the duration of the prescription.
(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a physician may prescribe
supplies related to ostomy care in a quantity exceeding any limit imposed by law, regulation,
rule, guidance or insurance policy if the physician determines that it is necessary and expedient
for patient care.
(c) Fulfillment of prescriptions related to ostomy supplies shall not be delayed by any
approval or appeal process.
of 9

(d) Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced
notification of prescription expiration to both patients and their prescribers.
(e) Fulfillment of prescriptions related to ostomy supplies shall be dispensed as written.
Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced notification of
their intention to substitute ostomy supply brands or products, also known as non-medical
switching. Notification by mail shall include samples of the proposed product substitution for the
patient to try. If a substitute product fails to meet or exceed the quality of the original and
thereby compromises the patient's ostomy care, the patient shall have the option of returning to
their original product or shall receive a product that matches the quality of the original.
SECTION 4. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 10Z the following section:-
Section 10AA. (a) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health
maintenance organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators
under contract to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall
provide coverage of all medical supplies for management of surgically created or spontaneous
fistulas and coverage of supplies related to ostomy care. The division shall not require the use of
non-medical supplies for a patient to receive coverage under this section. The division shall
make publicly available information about its coverage of supplies related to ostomy care.
(b) If a person obtains new health insurance coverage, information about the person’s
ostomy care and patient history shall be transferred to the new insurer within 72 hours for
continuity of care. Ostomy supply orders and shipments shall not be delayed during the transition
period.
of 9

(c) Healthcare payers shall reimburse suppliers of supplies related to ostomy care at a rate
not less than the Medicare reimbursement rate.
(d) Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced
notification of prescription expiration to both patients and their prescribers.
(e) Fulfillment of prescriptions related to ostomy supplies shall be dispensed as written.
Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced notification of
their intention to substitute ostomy supply brands or products, also known as non-medical
switching. Notification by mail shall include samples of the proposed product substitution for the
patient to try. If a substitute product fails to meet or exceed the quality of the original and
thereby compromises the patient's ostomy care, the patient shall have the option of returning to
their original product or shall receive a product that matches the quality of the original.
SECTION 5. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting before
section 47CCC the following section:-
Section 47AAA. (a) Any blanket or general policy of insurance described in subdivision
(A), (C), or (D) of section one hundred and ten which is issued or subsequently renewed by
agreement between the insurer and the policyholder, within or without the commonwealth,
during the period within which this premium is effective, or any policy of accident or sickness
insurance as described in section one hundred and eight which provides hospital expense and
surgical expense insurance and which is delivered or issued for delivery or subsequently renewed
by agreement between the insurer and the policyholder in the commonwealth, during the period
within which this provision is effective, or any employers' health and welfare fund which
provides hospital expense and surgical expense benefits and which is issued or renewed to any
of 9

person or group of persons in the commonwealth, during the period within which this provision
is effective, shall provide coverage of all medical supplies for management of surgically created
or spontaneous fistulas and coverage of supplies related to ostomy care including ostomy-related
medical or physiological complications. The policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of
insurance shall not require the use of non-medical supplies for a patient to receive coverage
under this section, and shall make publicly available information about its coverage of supplies
related to ostomy care.
(b) If a person obtains new health insurance coverage, information about the person’s
ostomy care and patient history shall be transferred to the new insurer within 72 hours for
continuity of care. Ostomy supply orders and shipments shall not be delayed during the transition
period.
(c) Healthcare payers shall reimburse suppliers of supplies related to ostomy care at a rate
not less than the Medicare reimbursement rate.
(d) Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced
notification of prescription expiration to both patients and their prescribers.
(e) Fulfillment of prescriptions related to ostomy supplies shall be dispensed as written.
Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced notification of
their intention to substitute ostomy supply brands or products, also known as non-medical
switching. Notification by mail shall include samples of the proposed product substitution for the
patient to try. If a substitute product fails to meet or exceed the quality of the original and
thereby compromises the patient's ostomy care, the patient shall have the option of returning to
their original product or shall receive a product that matches the quality of the original.
of 9

SECTION 6. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
100 section 8DDD the following section:-
101 Section 8EEE. (a) A contract, except contracts providing supplemental coverage to
102 Medicare or other governmental programs, between a subscriber and the corporation under an
103 individual or group hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed in the
104 commonwealth shall provide as benefits to all individual subscribers or members within the
105 commonwealth, and to all group members having a principal place of employment within the
106 commonwealth, coverage of all medical supplies for management of surgically created or
107 spontaneous fistulas and coverage of supplies related to ostomy care including ostomy-related
108 medical or physiological complications. The contract shall not require the use of non-medical
109 supplies for a patient to receive coverage under this section. The corporation shall make publicly
110 available information about its coverage of supplies related to ostomy care.
111 (b) If a person obtains new health insurance coverage, information about the person’s
112 ostomy care and patient history shall be transferred to the new insurer within 72 hours for
113 continuity of care. Ostomy supply orders and shipments shall not be delayed during the transition
114 period.
115 (c) Healthcare payers shall reimburse suppliers of supplies related to ostomy care at a rate
116 not less than the Medicare reimbursement rate.
117 (d) Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced
118 notification of prescription expiration to both patients and their prescribers.
119 (e) Fulfillment of prescriptions related to ostomy supplies shall be dispensed as written.
120 Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced notification of
of 9

121 their intention to substitute ostomy supply brands or products, also known as non-medical
122 switching. Notification by mail shall include samples of the proposed product substitution for the
123 patient to try. If a substitute product fails to meet or exceed the quality of the original and
124 thereby compromises the patient's ostomy care, the patient shall have the option of returning to
125 their original product or shall receive a product that matches the quality of the original.
126 SECTION 7. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
127 section 4DDD the following section:-
128 Section 4EEE. (a) A subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service
129 agreement delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide coverage of all
130 medical supplies for management of surgically created or spontaneous fistulas and coverage of
131 supplies related to ostomy care. The subscription certificate shall not require the use of non-
132 medical supplies for a patient to receive coverage under this section. The medical service
133 corporation shall make publicly available information about its coverage of supplies related to
134 ostomy care.
135 (b) If a person obtains new health insurance coverage, information about the person’s
136 ostomy care and patient history shall be transferred to the new insurer within 72 hours for
137 continuity of care. Ostomy supply orders and shipments shall not be delayed during the transition
138 period.
139 (c) Healthcare payers shall reimburse suppliers of supplies related to ostomy care at a rate
140 not less than the Medicare reimbursement rate.
141 (d) Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced
142 notification of prescription expiration to both patients and their prescribers.
of 9

143 (e) Fulfillment of prescriptions related to ostomy supplies shall be dispensed as written.
144 Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced notification of
145 their intention to substitute ostomy supply brands or products, also known as non-medical
146 switching. Notification by mail shall include samples of the proposed product substitution for the
147 patient to try. If a substitute product fails to meet or exceed the quality of the original and
148 thereby compromises the patient's ostomy care, the patient shall have the option of returning to
149 their original product or shall receive a product that matches the quality of the original.
150 SECTION 8. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
151 section 4VV the following section:-
152 Section 4WW. (a) An individual or group health maintenance contract, except contracts
153 providing supplemental coverage to Medicare or other governmental programs, that is issued or
154 renewed within the commonwealth shall provide coverage and benefits of all medical supplies
155 for management of surgically created or spontaneous fistulas and coverage of supplies related to
156 ostomy care. The contract shall not require the use of non-medical supplies for a patient to
157 receive coverage under this section. The health maintenance organization shall make publicly
158 available information about its coverage of supplies related to ostomy care.
159 (b) If a person obtains new health insurance coverage, information about the person’s
160 ostomy care and patient history shall be transferred to the new insurer within 72 hours for
161 continuity of care. Ostomy supply orders and shipments shall not be delayed during the transition
162 period.
163 (c) Healthcare payers shall reimburse suppliers of supplies related to ostomy care at a rate
164 not less than the Medicare reimbursement rate.
of 9

165 (d) Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced
166 notification of prescription expiration to both patients and their prescribers.
167 (e) Fulfillment of prescriptions related to ostomy supplies shall be dispensed as written.
168 Suppliers of ostomy supplies shall be required to provide 1 month's advanced notification of
169 their intention to substitute ostomy supply brands or products, also known as non-medical
170 switching. Notification by mail shall include samples of the proposed product substitution for the
171 patient to try. If a substitute product fails to meet or exceed the quality of the original and
172 thereby compromises the patient's ostomy care, the patient shall have the option of returning to
173 their original product or shall receive a product that matches the quality of the original.
of 9